California statutes. Public Resources Code
 are necessary for agricultural production and marketing, including, but not limited to, barns, shops, packing sheds, cooling facilities, greenhouses, roadside marketing stands, stock water development and storage, energy generation, and fencing, if the agricultural productivity of the land and any multiple uses that made the acquisition a priority for selection under the program are not significantly impaired by those activities.

(c) Customary part time or off season rural enterprises or activities, including, but not limited to, hunting and fishing, wildlife habitat improvement, predator control, timber harvesting, and firewood production, if the agricultural productivity of the land and any multiple uses that made the acquisition a priority for selection under the program are not significantly impaired by those activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 502, Sec. 34.   (AB 2964)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10262.5.

The granting of an agricultural conservation easement under this division shall not be interpreted to convey any rights of public access to the subject property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 616, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10263.

(a) The department shall act on an application for a grant within 180 days after the department determines that it is complete.

(b) The department shall notify the applicant of the department’s
 decision in writing. For any decision to disapprove an application, the written notice shall state the reason for the disapproval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 502, Sec. 37.   (AB 2964)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10264.

The director shall disapprove the application for a grant for the acquisition of an agricultural conservation easement or fee title in any of the following circumstances:

(a) The application does not satisfy the eligibility criteria set forth in Section 10251.

(b) The department has determined that clear title to the agricultural conservation easement cannot be conveyed.

(c) There is insufficient money in the fund to carry out the acquisition.

(d) Other acquisitions have a higher
 priority.

(e) The application does not satisfy other relevant requirements provided by the fund source or in the guidelines, solicitation, application, or other relevant control documents, as determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 502, Sec. 38.   (AB 2964)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10.3. AGRICULTURAL PROTECTION PLANNING GRANT PROGRAM [10280. - 10283.]

10280.

The Agricultural Protection Planning Grant Program is hereby established within the Department of Conservation, to provide planning grants to do all of the following:

(a) Conserve California’s most productive farmlands and ecologically important rangelands.

(b) Advance California’s climate change goals through carbon sequestration and greenhouse gas emissions reductions resulting from the implementation of local plans.

(c) Maintain local food supplies and agricultural economies through the protection of agricultural lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 80.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10280.5.

The following terms have the following meanings as used in this division, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) “Authority” means an entity established by the state that requires its members, including, but not limited to, local government entities, to adopt a resolution stating their intent to participate.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Conservation.

(c) “Grant program” means the program established pursuant to Section 10280.

(d) “Joint powers authority” means a joint powers authority established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code that is formed in part to protect agricultural land.

(e) “Local government entity” means any city, county, city and county, or district, including, but not limited to, park and open-space districts, resource conservation districts, and other special districts.

(f) “Nonprofit organization” means any nonprofit public benefit corporation that has among its purposes the conservation of agricultural lands, and holds a tax exemption, as defined under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and further qualifies as an organization under Section 170(b)(1)(A)(iv) or 170(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 983, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10281.

The purpose of the grant program is to assist any local government entity, nonprofit organization, authority, or joint powers authority to apply for, and cost-effectively use, grant funds available for farmland, grazing lands, and grasslands protection and preservation from funds that are made available pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5096.650 and from other funding sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 983, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10281.5.

(a) In addition to the requirements established by the department, the applicant shall demonstrate that the changes to the existing goals, objectives, policies, or programs of the city, county, or city and county that will logically result from the grant will improve protection of, or have a beneficial effect on climate change goals for, agricultural land, grazing land, or grasslands.

(b) Prior to awarding funds under the program, the department shall develop guidelines and selection criteria for awarding grants in accordance with all of the following:

(1) Prior to the adoption of the guidelines and selection criteria, the department shall conduct at least two public workshops to receive and consider public comments.

(2) The department shall publish the draft guidelines and selection
 criteria on its Internet Web site at least 30 days prior to the public meetings.

(3) In adopting the guidelines and selection criteria, the department shall consider the comments from farming and ranching groups, agricultural land conservation groups, building and construction groups, local governments, regional agencies, and other stakeholders.

(4) Program guidelines may be revised by the department to reflect changes in program focus or need. Outreach to stakeholders shall be conducted pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) before the department adopts changes to guidelines.

(c) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development and adoption of the guidelines and selection criteria pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 434, Sec. 10.   (SB 732)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10282.

(a) Under the grant program, a local government entity, nonprofit organization, authority, or joint powers authority may apply to the department for a planning grant to be used for the protection of agricultural lands and grazing lands, including oak woodlands and grasslands. In addition to any requirements established by the department, to be eligible for a grant under the grant program, an applicant shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify and map, utilizing the designations in the farmlands mapping and monitoring program of the Department of Conservation pursuant to Section 65570 of the Government Code, existing or potential agricultural lands in its jurisdiction.

(2) Specify its existing goals, objectives, policies, or programs that support the long-term protection of agricultural land.

(3) Specify the proposed changes to its existing goals, objectives, policies, or programs that support the long-term protection of agricultural land.

(4) Specify how the planning grant would be used to improve the long-term protection of agricultural land within its jurisdiction.

(b) A grant awarded by the department under the grant program shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to any applicant, or seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) if the department determines that a grant application is for collaborative
 planning activities proposed to include two or more adjacent counties, cities, or city and county.

(c) In granting funds pursuant to this division, the department shall give priority to proposals that include matching funds from local sources.

(d) A grant proposal by a park or open-space district, resource conservation district, other special district, authority, or joint powers authority shall be approved by resolution of the city, county, or city and county, or multiple cities and counties, whose jurisdiction the proposal is intended to benefit. The city, county, or city and county shall provide evidence that it is willing to implement some of the planning process funded by the grant.

(e) The purposes for which a grant
 made pursuant to this division for agricultural protection may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) To update the general plan of a city, county, or city and county to improve protection of agricultural land, or a zoning ordinance designed to improve protection of agricultural land.

(2) To develop multicounty strategies to protect agricultural land.

(3) To develop city-county agreements to protect agricultural land.

(4) To develop strategies to implement existing general plan provisions, city-county agreements, or multicounty agreements to protect agricultural land, including technical assistance.

(5) To develop public-private partnerships for the long-term protection and stewardship of agricultural lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 434, Sec. 11.   (SB 732)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10283.

Eligible projects funded under this division with the proceeds from the sale of any bonds shall be consistent with the requirements of Section 16727 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 983, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10.4. RANGELAND, GRAZING LAND, AND GRASSLAND PROTECTION ACT [10330. - 10344.]

10330.

The Wildlife Conservation Board is hereby designated as the lead agency of the state for carrying out the program of rangeland, grazing land, and grassland protection pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10331.

The California Rangeland, Grazing Land, and Grassland Protection Program is hereby established to protect California’s rangeland, grazing land, and grasslands through the use of conservation easements, for the following purposes:

(a) To prevent the conversion of rangeland, grazing land, and grassland to nonagricultural uses.

(b) To protect the long-term sustainability of livestock grazing.

(c) To ensure continued wildlife, water quality, watershed, and open-space benefits to the State of California from livestock grazing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10332.

As used in this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Wildlife Conservation Board created pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1320) of Chapter 4 of Division 20 of the Fish and Game Code.

(b) “Conservation easement” means a conservation easement, as defined by Section 815.1 of the Civil Code, that is perpetual.

(c) “Local public agency” means any city, county, city and county, resource conservation district, district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3 of Division 5, authority formed pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 35100), or joint powers authority made up of two or more local public agencies and one or more state agencies.

(d) “Nonprofit organization” means any nonprofit public benefit corporation formed pursuant to the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), qualified to do business in California, and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code as a tax-exempt corporation that has as a principal purpose the conservation of land and water resources.

(e) “Property” means any real property, and any perpetual interest therein, including land, conservation easements, and land containing water rights.

(f) “Qualified property” means property that is rangeland, grazing land, or grassland and is used or is suitable for grazing; is zoned for agricultural grazing, or open-space use; and is used or suitable for habitat for aquatic or terrestrial wildlife species or native plants.

(g) “State agency” means any public entity created by statute within the Resources Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10334.

Funds may be expended by the board for the acquisition of conservation easements over qualified property pursuant to the authority granted to the board under Section 1348 of the Fish and Game Code. The board may also make grants of funds to a state agency, local public agency, or nonprofit organization for the acquisition of conservation easements over qualified property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10335.

Funds expended pursuant to this division may be used only to acquire conservation easements to protect rangeland, grazing lands, and grasslands, consistent with the purposes of Sections 10331 and 10337. If additional property interests, restrictions, enhancements, or access is acquired in addition to a conservation easement, funds for those additional acquisitions shall be provided from other sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10335.5.

(a) Any eligible projects funded under this division with the proceeds from the sale of any bonds shall be consistent with the requirements of Section 16727 of the Government Code.

(b) Of the total amount of funds derived from the proceeds of bonds and appropriated by Section 2 of the act adding this division, the board may not expend more than 5 percent for associated programmatic costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10336.

The board may adopt guidelines to implement the program, including the establishment of procedures and a schedule for submittal of applications for grants and a requirement that conservation easements be monitored not less than every two years. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the guidelines adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10337.

A conservation easement may be acquired pursuant to this division only if its acquisition will protect, restore, or enhance rangeland, grazing land, or grassland and sustain the character of the property. In evaluating qualified property, the board and any recipient of a grant may consider all of the following criteria:

(a) The productivity or potential productivity of the land.

(b) The long-term economic viability of the property.

(c) The threat to the property of urban or intensified rural development.

(d) The presence of scenic open-space or viewshed, historic, or archeological values, or unique geologic features.

(e) The presence of water resources, including groundwater recharge.

(f) The presence of vegetation with ecological significance, such as oak woodlands, forests, riparian corridor, or native vegetation.

(g) The quality of the soil.

(h) The location of the property relative to an urban sphere of influence.

(i) The location of the property relative to other properties preserved by conservation easements.

(j) Whether protecting this property will assist in protecting other lands.

(k) The geographic concentration of other rangelands, grazing lands, and grasslands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10338.

At a minimum, each application for a grant shall contain all of the following:

(a) A legal description of the property and a description of the current use of the land and the habitat types of the property, including documentation of how acquisition of a conservation easement will preserve rangeland, grazing land, or grassland.

(b) An independent and impartial appraisal prepared by a real estate appraiser who is licensed pursuant to the Real Estate Appraisers’ Licensing and Certification Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code).

(c) Certification by the prospective seller of the conservation easement that the seller was not, and is not, required to satisfy a condition imposed upon the seller by any lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement for use issued by one or more public agencies, including, but not limited to, the mitigation of significant effects on the environment of a project pursuant to an approved environmental impact report or mitigated negative declaration required pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(d) Disclosure of any known or suspected environmental conditions associated with the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10339.

The board may require further information as is reasonably necessary to allow the board to evaluate the proposed acquisition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10340.

The board, or the recipient of a grant, may accept contributions of money from a prospective seller to pay or reimburse the costs of appraisal, escrow, and title, and other transaction costs associated with the acquisition, including any environmental assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10341.

The board may request staff services from any state agency that submits an application for a grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10342.

Any conservation easement, money, or other asset acquired pursuant to this division shall not be deemed a transfer pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2780) of Chapter 9 of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10343.

(a) Nothing in this division authorizes or increases the authority of any public agency to use eminent domain to acquire private property.

(b) Nothing in this division diminishes any existing land or water right held by an existing easement holder in any property for which acquisition of a conservation easement is proposed.

(c)An existing mineral rights holder, as identified in the public records in the county where the property is located, shall be given notice of intent to purchase a conservation easement. The notice may be given by any means authorized by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10344.

The board may coordinate this program with the Oak Woodlands Conservation Act established pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 1360) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, as administered by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10.5. CALIFORNIA FOREST LEGACY PROGRAM ACT OF 2007 [12200. - 12276.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [12200. - 12231.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title [12200. - 12200.]

12200.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Forest Legacy Program Act of 2007.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Findings and Declarations [12210. - 12211.]

12210.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Privately owned forest lands comprise nearly half of California’s 32.6 million acres of forest land, and include some of the state’s most important and productive forest resources, including timber, fish and wildlife habitat, watersheds, and climate benefits. It is in the interest of the state to provide and maintain a favorable climate for long-term investment in forest resources.

(b) The importance of private forest lands to California’s economy and environment has been recognized for many years, and more recently for almost three decades by the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4), the California Timber Productivity Act of 1982 (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 51100) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and other statutes and policies.

(c) California’s private forest lands and woodlands are threatened by continued population growth and changes in land use patterns, including parcel size reductions, residential and commercial development, and by changes in forest cover.

(d) Heirs of forest landowners frequently find it necessary to harvest their timber prematurely and excessively, in order to pay estate taxes that can account for up to 55 percent of an estate’s value.

(e) Continuing statewide population growth, existing land use and tax policies, regulations, and other factors create significant pressure for an increase in development conversions in forest lands of environmental and economic significance.

(f) Conservation easements have been successfully used around the United States to achieve voluntary protection of open space, historical sites, and natural and aquatic resources.

(g) Conservation easements enable landowners to receive financial benefits for voluntarily restricting specific development rights and land that, in turn, contributes to the conservation of natural resources for future generations. Financial benefits to landowners can be realized through a sale or donation, or a combination of both a sale or donation of a conservation easement.

(h) A program to encourage and make possible the long-term conservation of forest lands and all associated natural resources is a necessary part of the state’s land protection policies and programs, and it is in the public interest to expend money for that purpose.

(i) Funding is a necessary component of this program.

(j) The federal Forest Legacy Program (16 U.S.C. Sec. 2103c) conserves forest land threatened with conversion and development by providing federal matching funds for the acquisition of conservation easements or other interests in land from willing landowners, subject to state guidelines.

(k) The state completed the “California Forest Legacy Program Assessment of Need” in 1995 following an extensive analysis and widespread public input. That assessment was submitted to and accepted by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(l) California’s forests can play an important role in addressing global climate change and helping the state meet its emission reduction targets by removing and storing carbon dioxide, a key greenhouse gas.

(m) The California Forest Legacy Program Act of 2000, established pursuant to Senate Bill 1832 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session of the Legislature, which expired on January 1, 2007, was successful in helping to protect approximately 12,000 acres of California forests by facilitating the expenditure of almost four million dollars ($4,000,000) in federal funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12211.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this division and the California Forest Legacy Program, to protect forest lands and aquatic resources in California by focusing on all of the following priorities:

(a) Encouraging the long-term conservation of productive forest lands by providing an incentive to owners of private forest lands to prevent future conversions of forest land and forest resources.

(b) Protection of wildlife habitat, rare plants, and biodiversity.

(c) Maintenance of habitat connectivity and related values needed to ensure the viability of wildlife populations across landscapes and regions.

(d) Protection of riparian habitats, oak woodlands, ecological old growth forests, and other key forest types and seral stages that are poorly represented across landscapes and regions, and that play a key role in supporting biodiversity.

(e) Protection of water quality, fisheries, and water supplies.

(f) Maintenance and restoration of natural ecosystem functions.

(g) Encouraging improvements to enhance long-term sustainable forest uses while providing forest areas with increased protection against other land uses that conflict with forest uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Definitions [12220. - 12220.]

12220.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this division.

(a) “Applicant” means a landowner who is eligible for cost-sharing grants pursuant to the federal Forest Legacy Program (16 U.S.C. Sec. 2103 et seq.) or who is eligible to participate in the California Forest Legacy Program and the operation of the program, with regard to that applicant, does not rely on federal funding.

(b) “Biodiversity” is a component and measure of ecosystem health and function. It is the number and genetic richness of different individuals found within the population of a species, of populations found within a species range, of different species found within a natural community or ecosystem, and of different communities and ecosystems found within a region.

(c) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(d) “Conservation easement” has the same meaning as found in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 815) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code.

(e) “Conversions” is a generic term for situations in which forest lands become used for nonforest uses, particularly those uses that alter the landscape in a relatively permanent fashion.

(f) “Department” means the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection and “director” means the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(g) “Forest land” is land that can support 10-percent native tree cover of any species, including hardwoods, under natural conditions, and that allows for management of one or more forest resources, including timber, aesthetics, fish and wildlife, biodiversity, water quality, recreation, and other public benefits.

(h) “Landowner” means an individual, partnership, private, public, or municipal corporation, Indian tribe, state agency, county, or local government entity, educational institution, or association of individuals of whatever nature that own private forest lands or woodlands.

(i) “Local government” means a city, county, district, or city and county.

(j) “Nonprofit organization” means any qualified land trust organization, as defined in Section 170(h)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code, that is organized for one of the purposes of Section 170(b)(1)(A)(vi) or 170(h)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code, and that has, among its purposes, the conservation of forest lands.

(k) “Program” means the California Forest Legacy Program established under this division.

(l) “Woodlands” are forest lands composed mostly of hardwood species such as oak.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [12230. - 12231.]

12230.

The department shall carry out the California Forest Legacy Program. Nothing in this division alters the department’s responsibility for the administration of state, federal, or private funds that are allocated for the purpose of protecting private forest lands and all associated natural resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12231.

Nothing in this chapter grants any new authority to the department to affect local policy or land use decisionmaking.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. California Forest Legacy Program [12240. - 12249.6.]

12240.

The California Forest Legacy Program is hereby established. The Wildlife Conservation Board may acquire conservation easements on behalf of the department, pursuant to this division. The California Forest Legacy Program may also include those activities eligible for funding under the federal Forest Legacy Program (16 U.S.C. Sec. 2103c), and the state program
 shall be coordinated with the federal program to the maximum amount possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 252, Sec. 2.   (AB 2169)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12241.

Money to fund the California Forest Legacy Program shall be obtained from gifts, donations, federal grants and loans, other appropriate funding sources, and through the allocations for the California Wildlife Conservation Board, including those provided from the sale of general obligation bonds pursuant to the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2006 (Division 43 (commencing with Section 75001)) and made available by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75055 and pursuant to the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2000 (the Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) (Chapter 1.692 (commencing with Section 5096.300) of Division 5) and made available for appropriation pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.350.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12242.

The implementation of the program includes the costs associated with the purchase or facilitated donation of conservation easements, technical assistance provided by the department, technology transfer activities of the department, and administrative costs incurred by the department in administering the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12244.

Easements acquired under this program may be held by federal, state, or local government entities or by nonprofit land trust organizations. The director shall find that any recipient of a conservation easement is qualified to monitor and enforce the terms of the easement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12245.

The director shall not disburse any funds until the applicant agrees to both of the following:

(a) That any conservation easement acquired shall be used by the applicant only for the purpose for which the funds were requested.

(b) That the director shall find that any disposition of the easement is consistent with, and in furtherance of, the purposes of this division, that the recipient of the easement is qualified to monitor and enforce the easement, and that the conservation provisions of the easement remain in effect following the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12246.

If a local, state, or national government agency or nonprofit land trust organization holding the easement is dissolved, the easement shall be transferred to an appropriate public or nonprofit land trust organization that is qualified to monitor and enforce the easement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12247.

The easement, or any of its terms, may only be amended with the consent of all of the necessary parties to the easement. The department shall determine that the amendment is consistent with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12248.

The director shall not disburse any funds unless the applicant agrees to restrict the use of the land in perpetuity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12249.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this division, including the standards, criteria, and requirements necessary for acquiring conservation easements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12249.5.

Rules or regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 12249 shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12249.6.

The department shall review, and approve or disapprove, applications from landowners for the acquisition of conservation easements on forest lands or woodlands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Eligibility Criteria [12250. - 12252.]

12250.

Every application for the acquisition of a conservation easement shall provide sufficient information to enable the department to verify the parcel’s eligibility for the program and to understand the conservation objectives and the parcel’s environmental value or potential to protect forest and aquatic resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12250.5.

In reviewing applications pursuant to this division, the department shall determine whether the proposed conservation easement meets the eligibility and selection criteria set forth in this chapter and conforms with any rules or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12251.

Proposed conservation easements shall meet the eligibility criteria set forth in this section prior to review pursuant to the selection criteria set forth in Section 12260. To be eligible for participation, private forest land parcels proposed for protection under the program shall comply with all of the following:

(a) Be subject to potential conversion.

(b) Be owned by landowners who are willing and interested in selling or donating conservation easements.

(c) Be forested with at least 10-percent canopy cover by conifer or hardwood species, or be capable of being so forested under natural conditions.

(d) Possession of one or more environmental values of great concern to the public and the state:

(1) Important fish and wildlife habitat.

(2) Areas that can help maintain habitat connectivity across landscapes.

(3) Rare plants.

(4) Biodiversity.

(5) Riparian habitats.

(6) Oak woodlands.

(7) Ecological old growth forests.

(8) Other key forest types and seral stages that are poorly represented across California.

(9) Lands that directly affect water quality and other watershed values.

(e) Provision for continuity of one or more traditional forest uses, such as commodities production or habitat maintenance.

(f) Possession of environmental values that can be protected and managed effectively through conservation easements at reasonable costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12252.

The easement shall not be required as a condition of any lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement for use issued by one or more public agencies, including, but not limited to, mitigating the significant effects on the environment of a project pursuant to an approved environmental impact report or mitigated negative declaration pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or pursuant to an approved environmental impact statement or a finding of no significant impact under the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C.A. Sec. 4321 et seq.) or the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C.A. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Selection Criteria and Process [12260. - 12264.]

12260.

If the department determines that the proposed conservation easement meets the eligibility criteria set forth in Section 12251, the application shall be reviewed based upon the extent to which it satisfies all of the following selection criteria:

(a) The nature of the environmental values proposed for protection, and whether they can be monitored efficiently and effectively.

(b) Whether the parcels are likely to become isolated from other areas maintained for key forest resources by development on adjacent parcels.

(c) Whether the landowner’s
 management goal for
 the landowner’s parcel is compatible with the resource protections the landowner is proposing.

(d) Whether the landowner has developed, or commits to developing by the time the easement is finalized, a management plan equivalent to, or better than, a forest stewardship plan that governs management on the parcel.

(e) Whether a nonprofit land trust organization, public agency, or other suitable organization has expressed an interest in working with the department and the landowner to establish, hold, and monitor the easement.

(f) Whether other sources of funding for easement acquisition, closing costs, monitoring, and other costs are available.

(g) Other relevant considerations established by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 97.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

12262.

An applicant shall select and retain an independent real estate appraiser to determine the value of the conservation easement, which shall be calculated by determining the difference between the fair market value and the restricted value of the property.
